Idaho, session 2025, S1060.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 18, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1807, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1807. DISTRIBUTION OF WATER BETWEEN DISTRICTS. (1) The director
may not curtail surface water usage in a district to satisfy surface or
ground water right claims in another district unless the affected surface
water users are able to seek relief within their district, which includes ap-
propriating surface, groundwater, springs, and any other water source owned
and administered by the state of Idaho.
(2) Once both the surface and groundwater districts in an individual
tributary district are fully operational and administered by the depart-
ment, the priority doctrine of first in time, first in right and the conjunc-
tive management rules shall apply as it pertains to all surface water, ground
water, springs, and any other waters of the state.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.